Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 3

Relocation of Utility Facilities

13-20-301. Findings and declarations.

The findings and declarations made in § 13-20-209, with respect to slum, blighted, and deteriorated areas, are hereby affirmed and restated.

Redevelopment and urban renewal project areas include streets, alleys, easements, and other public ways in, under, and over which utility facilities are installed. Public streets and alleys are intended for public travel and transportation; but they are also intended for proper utility uses in serving the public, as authorized by applicable laws of this state, and such utility usage is for the benefit of the public served. Without making use of public ways, utility lines could not reach or economically service the adjacent public, particularly in urban areas; and further:

The business and activities of utilities involve the rendition of essential public services vital to the health, safety and welfare of the citizens of this state;

The development and existence of utilities directly and vitally affects the development, growth, and expansion of the general welfare, business and industry of this state; and

All persons in this state are actual or potential customers of one (1) or more utility services, and all consumers will be affected by the cost of relocation of their facilities as necessary to accommodate redevelopment and urban renewal projects.

The obligation of such utility relocation is a burden on the public of this state and it is, therefore, in the public interest that such burden be minimized consistent with the purpose of such redevelopment and urban renewal project; therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly to ensure that the police power of the state in requiring relocation of utilities be exercised in a responsible manner.

The cost of utility relocation necessitated by redevelopment and urban renewal projects undertaken in accordance with §§ 13-20-101 — 13-20-215, and any amendments thereto, are properly a part of the cost of such projects, and it is in the public interest to provide for the equitable reimbursement of such cost of relocation; therefore, such relocation cost shall be included as part of the project costs of such redevelopment and urban renewal projects.

The statements in this section are legislative determinations and declarations of public policy, and this part should be liberally construed in conformity with its declaration and provisions to promote the public interest.

Acts 1971, ch. 191, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-828.

13-20-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cost of relocation” means the entire amount paid properly attributable to such relocation, after deducting therefrom any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility;

“Public service facility” means any sewer, pipe, main, conduit, manhole, cable, wire, pole, tower, building, or utility appliance owned or operated by a utility;

“Relocation” means any horizontal or vertical movement of utility facilities intact and any protective measures taken or the construction of new or additional facilities, with or without contemporaneous removal and salvage of old facilities, including removal, readjustment, rerouting, or changing the grade of or alternating the construction of any public service facility, either temporarily or permanently, whether or not such relocation is made necessary by the closing of any highway, street, public alley or public right-of-way or the taking of easements whether publicly or privately owned; and

“Utility” includes all utilities either public, private, or cooperatively owned which furnish utility service including, but not limited to, water, electric power, sanitary sewers, storm sewers, steam power, gas, and telephone or telegraph service, through a system of pipes, conduits, cables, or wires devoted to public utility service.

Acts 1971, ch. 191, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-829.

13-20-303. Reimbursement of cost of moving utility facilities.

Whenever a municipality, housing authority, or other public body of this state determines that the relocation of public service facilities of a utility within a redevelopment or urban renewal project area is necessary to the carrying out of a redevelopment or urban renewal plan pursuant to this chapter, the municipality, housing authority, or other public body shall reimburse the utility for the cost of relocation of such facilities.

Acts 1971, ch. 191, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-830.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 2.

13-20-304. Exceptions.

This part shall not apply to any taking or damaging of property for which the utility is entitled compensation pursuant to the constitution of Tennessee or the United States, or pursuant to any binding agreement inuring to the utility's benefit.

Acts 1971, ch. 191, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-831.